North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-43.1 Motor Vehicle Fuels and Importer for Use Taxes
57-43.1-17.
Commissioner to audit report and assess tax.

The commissioner, or an authorized representative, may audit the records, books, and papers, and examine fuel and any equipment used to store, transport, or dispense fuel, of a refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, terminal operator, retailer, or common or contract carrier. For a person required to file a report, the examination and audit shall be done no later than three years after the due date of the report or three years after the report was filed, whichever period expires later. The commissioner is authorized to make assessments of tax, plus penalty and interest, or to issue credits or refunds as determined on the basis of the examination and audit.

If it is determined upon audit that the tax due was twenty-five percent or more above the amount reported on a report, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be begun without such assessment, at any time within six years after the due date of the report, or six years after the report was filed, whichever period expires later.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commissioner may audit any consumer’s claim for a refund of tax, and, not later than three years after the due date of the claim or three years after the claim was filed, whichever period expires later, assess additional tax or issue an additional refund. If additional tax is found due or if an additional tax refund applies, the commissioner shall notify the claimant in detail of the reason for the increase or decrease. For any claim selected for audit, the claimant shall provide additional verification as required by the commissioner of fuel purchases, payment of the tax, use of the fuel for a purpose entitling the claimant to a refund, and use of the fuel other than in a licensed motor vehicle.

If a person gives false or fraudulent information in a tax report or in a claim for refund, or if the failure by a person to file a tax report is due to the fraudulent intent or the willful attempt of the person in any manner to evade the tax, the time limitations in this section do not apply, and the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be begun without such assessment, at any time.

If, before the expiration of the time prescribed in this chapter for the assessment of tax, the commissioner and the person consent in writing to an extension of time for the assessment of the tax, the tax may be assessed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

A determination of additional tax due issued to a person fixes the tax finally and irrevocably unless the person against whom it is assessed, within thirty days after the giving of notice of the determination, protests the determination under rules adopted by the commissioner and in the manner provided in chapter 28-32.

A determination that a claim for a tax credit or refund is disallowed becomes finally and irrevocably fixed unless the person claiming the refund, within thirty days after the giving of notice of the determination, protests the determination under rules adopted by the commissioner and in the manner provided in chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1991, ch. 688, § 5; 1997, ch. 498, § 9; 1999, ch. 526, § 18.

57-43.1-17.1.
Determination if no report is filed.

If a person fails, neglects, or refuses to file a motor vehicle fuel tax report when due, the commissioner shall, on the basis of available information, determine the tax liability for the period during which no report was filed, and to the tax thus determined the commissioner shall add the penalty and interest as provided in section 57-43.1-21. An assessment made by the commissioner under this section or section 57-43.1-21 is presumed to be correct, and in any case when the validity of the assessment is in question, the burden is on the person who challenges the assessment to establish by fair preponderance of evidence that it is erroneous or excessive.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 727, § 7; 1999, ch. 526, § 19.

57-43.1-17.2.
Corporate officer liability.

If a corporation holding a license issued under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the president, vice president, secretary, or treasurer, jointly or severally, having control or supervision of, or charged with the responsibility for making, such returns and payments is personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a corporation does not discharge an officer’s liability for a prior failure of the corporation to make a return or remit the tax due. The sum due for such a liability may be assessed and collected under the provisions of this chapter for the assessment and collection of other liabilities.

If the corporate officers elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the corporation must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual motor vehicle fuel tax liability of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 553, § 3; 1999, ch. 509, § 8.

57-43.1-17.3.
Governor and manager liability.

If a limited liability company holding a license issued under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the taxes due under this chapter, the governors, managers, or members of a member-controlled limited liability company, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payments are personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a limited liability company does not discharge a governor’s, manager’s, or member’s liability for a prior failure of the limited liability company to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected under the provisions of this chapter.

If the governors, managers, or members elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability company must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual motor vehicle fuel tax liability of the limited liability company.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 100; 1995, ch. 103, § 78; 1999, ch. 509, § 9; 2001, ch. 521, § 6.

57-43.1-17.4.
Lien of tax — Collection — Action authorized.

When a taxpayer liable to pay a tax or penalty imposed refuses or neglects to pay the tax, the amount, including any interest, penalty, or addition to the tax, together with the costs that may accrue in addition to the tax, is a lien in favor of the state of North Dakota upon all property and rights to property, whether real or personal, belonging to the taxpayer, and in the case of property in which a deceased taxpayer held an interest as joint tenant or otherwise with right of survivorship at the time of death, the lien continues as a lien against the property in the hands of the survivors to the extent of the deceased taxpayer’s interest therein, which interest is determined by dividing the value of the entire property at the time of the taxpayer’s death by the number of joint tenants or persons interested therein.

The lien attaches at the time the tax becomes due and payable and continues until the liability for the amount is satisfied. For the purposes of this section, the words “due” and “due and payable” mean the first instant at which the tax becomes due.

Any mortgagee, purchaser, judgment creditor, or lien claimant acquiring any interest in, or lien on, any property situated in the state, prior to the commissioner filing in the central indexing system maintained by the secretary of state, a notice of the lien provided for in this section, takes free of, or has priority over, the lien.

The commissioner shall index in the central indexing system the following data:

The name of the taxpayer.

The name “State of North Dakota” as claimant.

The date and time the notice of lien was indexed.

The amount of the lien.

The internal revenue service taxpayer identification number or social security number of the taxpayer.

The commissioner is exempt from the payment of the filing fees as otherwise provided by law for the filing of a lien or the satisfaction of a lien.

Upon payment of the tax as to which the commissioner has indexed notice in the central indexing system, the commissioner shall index a satisfaction of the lien in the central indexing system.

Upon the request of the commissioner, the attorney general shall bring an action at law or in equity, as the facts may justify, without bond to enforce payment of any taxes and any penalties, or to foreclose the lien in the manner provided for mortgages on real or personal property, and in the action the attorney general shall have the assistance of the state’s attorney of the county in which the action is pending.

The foregoing remedies of the state are cumulative and no action taken by the commissioner or attorney general may be construed to be an election on the part of the state or any of its officers to pursue any remedy hereunder to the exclusion of any other remedy provided by law.

The notice of lien is effective as of eight a.m. next following the indexing of the notice. Any notice of lien filed by the commissioner may be indexed in the central indexing system without changing its original priority as to property in the county where the lien was filed.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 553, § 4; 1995, ch. 548, § 7; 1997, ch. 478, § 7; 1999, ch. 313, § 11; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2011, ch. 456, § 11; 2013, ch. 257, § 42; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

57-43.1-17.5.
Liability of a general partner in a limited liability limited partnership.

If a limited liability limited partnership holding a license issued under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due under this chapter, the general partners, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payment of the tax are personally liable for the partnership’s failure. The dissolution of a limited liability limited partnership does not discharge a general partner’s liability for a prior failure of the partnership to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the general partners elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability limited partnership must make a cash deposit or post with the commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking must be in an amount equal to the estimated motor fuel tax liability of the limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 443, § 36.

57-43.1-18.
Sale in original package — Invoice — Delivery of copies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-19.
Sale to consumer in original package — Invoice required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 498, § 18.

57-43.1-20.
Tax chargeable to consumer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-21.
Penalty and interest — Violations.

If a person fails to file the required report or to pay the full amount of the tax as required by this chapter, there is imposed a penalty of five dollars, or a sum equal to five percent of the tax due, whichever is greater, with interest at the rate of one percent per month on the tax due, for each calendar month or fraction of a month during which the delinquency continues, excepting the month within which the report was required to be filed or the tax became due. If a person files a false or fraudulent report with intent to evade the tax imposed by this chapter, there is imposed a penalty equal to ten percent of the deficiency, with interest at the rate of two percent per month on the deficiency, for each calendar month or fraction of a month during which the deficiency continues. The commissioner, for good cause shown, may waive all or any part of the penalty or interest provided by this subsection.

A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if:

The person refuses or knowingly or intentionally fails to make and file any report required by this chapter in the manner or within the time required; or

The person knowingly or with intent to evade or aid in the evasion of the tax imposed by this chapter makes any false statement or conceals any material fact in any application, record, report, or claim for refund provided for in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 20.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-43.1-22.
Conditions precedent to reinstatement of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-23.
Payment of tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-24.
Tax collection allowance.

The person required to remit the tax imposed by this chapter shall retain two percent of the amount of tax due to cover the cost of collecting the tax and transmitting it to the commissioner. This provision does not apply to tax on excess inventory losses and does not apply to additional tax assessed during an audit.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 21.

57-43.1-25.
Retention of records — Subject to inspection.

A refiner, supplier, distributor, importer, exporter, terminal operator, and retailer shall maintain and retain records of all motor vehicle fuel refined, purchased, imported, or otherwise acquired; of all motor vehicle fuel exported, sold, distributed, and used; and of all inventory records, for a period of not less than three years. Inventory records include physical readings, metered readings of sales, delivery tickets, and delivery readings. The records are open to inspection by the commissioner or by any agent or employee authorized by the commissioner during business hours.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 22.

57-43.1-26.
Inventory gains — Losses.

A supplier or distributor shall take a physical inventory reading of all motor vehicle fuel located in a terminal, underground tank, aboveground tank, railcar, storage tank of a truck, and the storage tank of a bulk delivery truck on a monthly basis and shall report the physical readings, inventory gains, and inventory losses to the commissioner. The inventory reconciliation must include motor vehicle fuel at retail locations and motor vehicle fuel stored in a barrel, drum, or other receptacle.

When sold or used by a supplier or distributor, a gain in motor vehicle fuel inventories is subject to the tax imposed by this chapter in the same manner as motor vehicle fuel purchased, imported, or otherwise acquired.

A supplier or distributor who experiences an actual physical inventory loss due to shrinkage or evaporation is responsible for the tax imposed by this chapter on any such loss that is in excess of one-half of one percent of the motor vehicle fuel received during the period covered by the inventory reconciliation.

For purposes of this chapter, it is presumed that all motor vehicle fuel received above the one-half of one percent allowance, except that gallonage shown as inventory based on physical inventory readings at the end of the time period covered by the inventory reconciliation, and other allowances provided in this chapter, has been sold, delivered, or used, and the supplier or distributor is liable for the amount of the motor vehicle fuel tax on each gallon [liter] of motor vehicle fuel not accounted for. For purposes of this chapter, motor vehicle fuel refined at a refinery in this state and placed in storage at the refinery, and motor vehicle fuel brought into the state by pipeline and placed in storage at a pipeline terminal, is not deemed received until it is withdrawn from the refinery or terminal storage for sale or use in this state, or for shipment or delivery to destinations in this state.

The commissioner may allow a tax credit to a supplier or distributor for actual inventory losses due to a casualty loss, based on proof of the loss as required by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 23; 1999, ch. 528, § 1; 2007, ch. 539, § 2.

57-43.1-27.
Sales of motor vehicle fuels to retail outlets — Tax imposed — Credit for losses.

When a supplier or distributor in motor vehicle fuels makes a sale to a retail outlet, the supplier or distributor shall credit the retail outlet with one-half of one percent of the total state motor vehicle fuel tax applied to the gallonage sold. This must appear on the face of the delivery invoice at the time of delivery of the motor vehicle fuel in consideration of evaporation and shrinkage losses and the retail outlet’s cost of collection of the tax. On making payments to the commissioner as provided in this chapter, the supplier or distributor shall deduct the total credit allowance granted on sales to retail outlets in motor vehicle fuels under the provisions of this section, in addition to other deductions allowed, from the amount of tax due.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1991, ch. 688, § 6; 1999, ch. 526, § 24; 1999, ch. 528, § 2.

57-43.1-28.
Transfer, deposit, and distribution of funds.

Taxes, license fees, penalties, and interest collected under the provisions of this chapter must be transferred to the state treasurer who shall deposit the moneys collected to the highway tax distribution fund. The highway tax distribution fund must be distributed in the manner prescribed by section 54-27-19.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 25; 2005, ch. 584, § 3.

57-43.1-29.
Motor fuel and other motor vehicle taxes to be used for highway purposes.

After deducting from state motor vehicle registration fees, license fees, motor fuel taxes, and other special taxes imposed on motor vehicle owners and operators, other than driver’s license fees, the cost of administration and collection authorized by legislative appropriation only, the proceeds remaining must be used for the construction, improvement, and maintenance of highways and the associated expenses of administration and for no other purpose, except the proceeds remaining as revenue from aviation gasoline taxes and unclaimed aviation motor fuel refunds and other aviation motor fuel excise and license taxation used by aircraft.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1.

57-43.1-30.
Administration — Assistance authorized — Rules.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. The commissioner may employ assistance and conduct investigations as may be necessary for the efficient administration and enforcement of this chapter and may adopt and enforce reasonable rules relating to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 26.

57-43.1-31.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-32.
Erroneously or illegally collected taxes.

If any taxes, penalties, or interest imposed by this chapter have been erroneously or illegally collected from any person, the commissioner may permit that person to take credit against a subsequent tax return for the amount of the erroneous or illegal overpayment. In the alternative, the commissioner shall present a voucher to the office of management and budget for payment of the amount erroneously or illegally collected and a warrant-check must be prepared by that office drawn on the state treasurer payable to that person. The refund must be paid to the person from undistributed funds received from the tax imposed by this chapter and any credit or refund may not be approved or paid unless it is an amount which is in excess of five dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 656, § 1; 1999, ch. 526, § 27.

57-43.1-33.
Levy of importer for use tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-34.
Computation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-35.
Exemptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-36.
Importer for use license required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-37.
Issuance and display. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-38.
Assignment forbidden. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-39.
Revocation, cancellation, and surrender of importer for use license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-40.
Occasional trip permits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-41.
Authorization of the commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 564, § 7.

57-43.1-42.
Credit for North Dakota purchases — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-42.1.
Credit for taxes paid on worthless accounts and refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-42.2.
Nonrefundability of taxes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 564, § 7.

57-43.1-43.
Importer for use tax, reports, payments, records, penalties, disposition of funds, audits, and assessments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 84.

57-43.1-44.
Cooperative motor vehicle fuels agreements.

The director may enter into cooperative agreements for exchange of information and auditing of users of motor fuels used in fleets of motor vehicles operated or intended to operate interstate or internationally. An agreement or amendment to an agreement is not effective until filed in writing with the director.

An agreement under this section may provide for determining the base for users, users’ records requirements, audit procedures, exchange of information, persons eligible for tax licensing, defining qualified motor vehicles, determining if bonding is required, specifying reporting requirements and periods including defining the uniform penalty and interest rates for late reporting, determining methods for collecting and forwarding of motor fuel taxes and penalties to another jurisdiction, and other provisions as will facilitate the administration of the agreement.

The director may, as required by the terms of the agreement, forward information in the director’s or commissioner’s possession relative to the manufacture, receipt, sale, use, transportation, or shipment of motor fuels by any person. The director may disclose the location of officers, motor vehicles, and other real and personal property of users of motor fuels.

An agreement may provide for audits of users of motor fuels used in fleets of motor vehicles operated or intended to operate interstate or internationally, to determine if the motor fuel taxes due are properly reported and paid. The findings of audits performed on persons that have a taxable use of motor fuels may be shared among parties to a cooperative agreement. For persons not based in this state and who have taxable use of motor fuel in this state, the director or the commissioner may serve the audit findings, in the form of an assessment, on the person as though an audit was conducted by the director or the commissioner.

Any agreement entered under this section does not preclude the director or the commissioner from auditing the records of any person covered by the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of any agreement entered into under this section prevail over any conflicting rules adopted by the director or the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 72, § 22; 2011, ch. 72, § 7.

57-43.1-45.
Motor vehicle fuel tax for interstate motor carriers — Computation — Credits — Refunds.

An interstate motor carrier importing motor vehicle fuel into the state is subject to the motor vehicle fuel tax imposed by this chapter on the number of gallons [liters] of fuel used in the state to propel licensed motor vehicles upon the public roads or highways in the state.

The amount of fuel used in interstate fleet operations by a motor carrier is determined by using a factor, the numerator of which is the total miles [kilometers] operated in this state and the denominator of which is the total miles [kilometers] operated both within and without this state applied to the total of that fuel used both within and without this state.

An interstate motor carrier is eligible for tax credits or tax refunds at the times and in the manner prescribed by a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.1-44.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 28.

57-43.1-46.
Interstate motor carrier required to obtain license — Display — Revocation or cancellation of license — Occasional trip permits in lieu of license.

An interstate motor carrier shall apply to the director for a license subject to the requirements of a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.1-44 and is required to display the license in a manner prescribed under the terms of the agreement.

The license issued to an interstate motor carrier is not a franchise or irrevocable and it may not be assigned or transferred.

The director shall issue a license to an interstate motor carrier based on the terms of the cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.1-44 and the license shall be in force until it is suspended, revoked, surrendered, or expires pursuant to the terms of the agreement.

An interstate motor carrier who makes only occasional trips into or through this state may elect to secure occasional trip permits in lieu of the license required by this section. The term “occasional” means no more than one trip into or through the state in any seventy-two-hour period. The commissioner, director, or an agent of the commissioner or director shall issue an occasional trip permit for a fee of fifteen dollars per trip pursuant to regulations and procedures prescribed by the commissioner or director.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 29.

57-43.1-47.
Interstate motor carrier tax reports — Payments — Audits — Assessments.

An interstate motor carrier shall file a tax report with the director and remit to the director any taxes, penalties, and interest due at the time and in the manner prescribed by the terms of a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.1-44. All moneys collected and received under this section must be transmitted monthly by the director to the state treasurer to be transferred and credited in the same manner as provided in section 57-43.1-28.

An interstate motor carrier shall obtain, create, maintain, and retain records as required by the terms of a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.1-44 and make those records available to the director or the commissioner for examination.

The director or commissioner shall audit the records of an interstate motor carrier at the times and in the manner prescribed by a cooperative agreement authorized by section 57-43.1-44.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 526, § 30.